Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202610-403
County and city bonds; proposition; rate of interest.

The proposition shall state the rate of interest such bond shall draw.

Laws 1869, § 3, p. 92;

R.S.1913, § 407;

C.S.1922, § 324;

C.S.1929, § 11-403;

R.S.1943, § 10-403;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 44.